Indiana, session 2026, SB153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-121, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2006,
SECTION 48, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 121. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision
of law:
(1) from December 1 through March 15; and
(2) from June 21 through September 23;
of any year, no an electric or gas utility (including a municipally
owned, privately owned, or cooperatively owned utility) shall may not
terminate residential electric or gas service for persons who are eligible
for and have applied for assistance from a heating home energy
assistance program administered under IC 4-4-33. The commission
shall implement procedures to ensure that electric or gas utility service
is continued while eligibility for such persons is being determined.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electric, gas,
or water utility (including a municipally owned, privately owned,
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


or cooperatively owned utility) may not terminate residential
electric, gas, or water service for any residential customer of the
utility on any of the following days:
(1) A Friday, Saturday, or Sunday.
(2) A legal holiday (as defined in IC 1-1-9-1).
(3) Any day, or after noon on the day preceding any day,
during which customer service representatives of the utility
are not available to respond to inquiries from customers
during regular business hours.
(b) (c) Any electric or gas utility (including a municipally owned,
privately owned, or cooperatively owned utility) shall provide any
residential customer whose account is delinquent an opportunity to
enter into a reasonable amortization agreement with such company to
pay the delinquent account. Such an amortization agreement must
provide the customer with adequate opportunity to apply for and
receive the benefits of any available public assistance program. An
amortization agreement is subject to amendment on the customer's
request if there is a change in the customer's financial circumstances.
(c) The commission may establish a reasonable rate of interest
which a utility may charge on the unpaid balance of a customer's
delinquent bill that may not exceed the rate established by the
commission under section 34.5 of this chapter.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electric, gas,
or water utility (including a municipally owned, privately owned,
or cooperatively owned utility) may not charge or collect any:
(1) deposit;
(2) reconnection fee; or
(3) other similar charge;
as a condition of, or in connection with, restoring service to a
residential customer of the utility following a termination of the
customer's service for nonpayment.
(d) (e) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(e) (f) This section does not prohibit an electric or gas utility from
terminating residential utility service upon a request of a customer or
under the following circumstances:
(1) If a condition dangerous or hazardous to life, physical safety,
or property exists.
(2) Upon order by any court, the commission, or other duly
authorized public authority.
(3) If fraudulent or unauthorized use of electricity or gas is
detected and the utility has reasonable grounds to believe the
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


affected customer is responsible for such use.
(4) If the utility's regulating or measuring equipment has been
tampered with and the utility has reasonable grounds to believe
that the affected customer is responsible for such tampering.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-6.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 6.1. Quarterly Residential Customer Reports by
Utilities
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "budget billing arrangement"
means a levelized payment arrangement that:
(1) is entered into by a utility and:
(A) a customer; or
(B) a low income customer;
of the utility;
(2) allows the customer or low income customer to pay for
utility service in equal monthly installments; and
(3) involves a reconciliation mechanism in which:
(A) the amount of utility service actually used by the
customer or low income customer during a specified period
is compared with the amount of utility service for which
the customer or low income customer was billed under the
arrangement during the specified period; and
(B) the account of the customer or low income customer is
either billed or credited, as appropriate, for any
discrepancy identified under clause (A).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "customer" refers to a
residential customer who:
(1) has agreed to pay for utility service from a utility; and
(2) is not a low income customer.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "low income customer" refers to
a residential customer who is part of a household that:
(1) has agreed to pay for utility service from a utility; and
(2) satisfies either of the following:
(A) Is eligible for and has applied for assistance from:
(i) a home energy assistance program administered
under IC 4-4-33; or
(ii) a low income household water assistance program
administered by the Indiana housing and community
development authority.
(B) Is eligible for one (1) or more of the following:
(i) The federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


(TANF) program.
(ii) The federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program (SNAP).
(iii) The Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for
Women, Infants, and Children (WIC).
(iv) Free or reduced price school meals.
(v) The federal Supplemental Security Income (SSI)
program.
(vi) Medicaid.
(vii) The healthy Indiana plan under IC 12-15-44.5.
(viii) The federal Child Care and Development Fund
(CCDF) voucher program or the federal Head Start
program.
(ix) Public housing or housing assistance programs.
(x) Other means tested programs.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "payment plan" means a
payment arrangement that:
(1) is entered into by a utility and:
(A) a customer; or
(B) a low income customer;
of the utility; and
(2) allows the customer or low income customer to:
(A) pay current or past due amounts for utility service in
lower amounts, over an extended period of time, or
according to another agreed upon schedule;
(B) defer the payment of current or past due amounts for
utility service to some future date; or
(C) receive a forbearance with respect to the payment of
certain amounts owed.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "protected account" means an
account that:
(1) is for utility service that:
(A) is provided to a:
(i) customer; or
(ii) low income customer;
who is vulnerable because of advanced age, serious illness,
or disability; and
(B) is not subject to termination or disconnection for
nonpayment or for which termination or disconnection for
nonpayment is restricted during specified periods; or
(2) otherwise qualifies as a protected account under rules
adopted by the commission under section 9 of this chapter.
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "utility" means a utility, however
organized, that:
(1) provides utility service to customers and low income
customers in Indiana; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "utility service" means
residential:
(1) electric;
(2) natural gas;
(3) water; or
(4) wastewater;
service that is provided at retail.
Sec. 8. (a) A utility shall submit to the commission quarterly
reports containing the information set forth in this subsection with
respect to the calendar quarter covered by the report. Beginning
with the calendar quarter specified in subsection (d), a utility shall
submit the reports required by this subsection to the commission
in the manner and form prescribed by the commission and not
later than thirty (30) days after the last day of the calendar quarter
covered by the report. A report submitted to the commission under
this subsection must include the following information with respect
to customers (not including low income customers with respect to
whom a report is required under subsection (b)) for each month in
the calendar quarter covered by the report, including, to the extent
available, a comparison of the same information for the same
month of the immediately preceding calendar year:
(1) The total number of open customer accounts.
(2) The total amount billed by the utility for all open customer
accounts.
(3) The total gross receipts received by the utility for all open
customer accounts.
(4) The total number of open protected accounts for
customers.
(5) The total number of open customer accounts that were
delinquent for at least sixty (60) days and not more than
ninety (90) days.
(6) The total dollar amount owed with respect to the accounts
identified under subdivision (5).
(7) The total number of open customer accounts that were
delinquent for ninety (90) days or more.
(8) The total dollar amount owed with respect to the accounts
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


identified under subdivision (7).
(9) The total number of customer accounts referred for
collection to an attorney or a collection agency.
(10) The total number of new payment plans entered into
between the utility and customers of the utility.
(11) The total number of new budget billing arrangements
entered into between the utility and customers of the utility.
(12) The total number of customer accounts sent a notice of
disconnection for nonpayment.
(13) The total number of utility service disconnections
performed for nonpayment.
(14) The total number of utility service restorations after
disconnection for nonpayment.
(15) The average duration of utility service disconnection for
customer accounts identified under subdivision (14).
(16) The total number of customer accounts written off as
uncollectible.
(17) The total dollar value of customer accounts identified
under subdivision (16).
(18) The total dollar value of recovered bad debt with respect
to customer accounts.
(19) Any other relevant information concerning customer
accounts that the commission:
(A) considers appropriate in evaluating:
(i) the payment history of customers; and
(ii) the billing and related practices of utilities with
respect to customers; and
(B) requires under rules adopted under section 9 of this
chapter.
(b) A utility shall submit to the commission quarterly reports
containing the information set forth in this subsection with respect
to the calendar quarter covered by the report. Beginning with the
calendar quarter specified in subsection (d), a utility shall submit
the reports required by this subsection to the commission in the
manner and form prescribed by the commission and not later than
thirty (30) days after the last day of the calendar quarter covered
by the report. A report submitted to the commission under this
subsection must include the following information with respect to
low income customers for each month in the calendar quarter
covered by the report, including, to the extent available, a
comparison of the same information for the same month of the
immediately preceding calendar year:
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


(1) The total number of open low income customer accounts.
(2) The total amount billed by the utility for all open low
income customer accounts.
(3) The total gross receipts received by the utility for all open
low income customer accounts.
(4) Of the total amount of gross receipts reported under
subdivision (3), the total amount that was paid through:
(A) a home energy assistance program administered under
IC 4-4-33; or
(B) a low income household water assistance program
administered by the Indiana housing and community
development authority.
(5) The total number of low income customers who received
assistance from:
(A) a home energy assistance program administered under
IC 4-4-33; or
(B) a low income household water assistance program
administered by the Indiana housing and community
development authority.
(6) The total number of open protected accounts for low
income customers.
(7) The total number of open low income customer accounts
that were delinquent for at least sixty (60) days and not more
than ninety (90) days.
(8) The total dollar amount owed with respect to the accounts
identified under subdivision (7).
(9) The total number of open low income customer accounts
that were delinquent for ninety (90) days or more.
(10) The total dollar amount owed with respect to the
accounts identified under subdivision (9).
(11) The total number of low income customer accounts
referred for collection to an attorney or a collection agency.
(12) The total number of new payment plans entered into
between the utility and low income customers of the utility.
(13) The total number of new budget billing arrangements
entered into between the utility and low income customers of
the utility.
(14) The total number of low income customer accounts sent
a notice of disconnection for nonpayment.
(15) The total number of utility service disconnections
performed for nonpayment.
(16) The total number of utility service restorations after
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


disconnection for nonpayment.
(17) The average duration of utility service disconnection for
low income customer accounts identified under subdivision
(16).
(18) The total number of low income customer accounts
written off as uncollectible.
(19) The total dollar value of low income customer accounts
identified under subdivision (18).
(20) The total dollar value of recovered bad debt with respect
to low income customer accounts.
(21) Any other relevant information concerning low income
customer accounts that the commission:
(A) considers appropriate in evaluating:
(i) the payment history of low income customers; and
(ii) the billing and related practices of utilities with
respect to low income customers; and
(B) requires under rules adopted under section 9 of this
chapter.
(c) A utility may report the information and data required
under subsections (a) and (b) at the same time and on the same
form, if so prescribed by the commission in rules adopted under
section 9 of this chapter.
(d) The first reports submitted to the commission under
subsections (a) and (b) must include the information set forth in
subsections (a) and (b) with respect to the third calendar quarter
of 2026.
(e) A utility shall report all information and data required
under subsections (a) and (b) in the aggregate and in a manner that
does not identify individual customers and low income customers
of the utility.
(f) This section does not empower the commission to require
utilities to disclose confidential and proprietary business
information without adequate protection of the information. The
commission shall exercise all necessary caution to avoid disclosure
of any confidential information reported by utilities under this
section.
Sec. 9. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Sec. 10. Beginning in 2027, the commission shall annually
compile and summarize the information received from utilities
under section 8 of this chapter for the previous calendar year and
include the commission's summary of the information in the
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119


commission's annual report under IC 8-1-1-14.
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "commission" refers to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission created by IC 8-1-1-2.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "utility" means an electric, gas,
or water utility, including a municipally owned, privately owned,
or cooperatively owned utility, subject to IC 8-1-2-121, as amended
by this act.
(c) Not later than December 31, 2026, the commission shall
amend the following rules of the commission as necessary to
conform the rules with IC 8-1-2-121, as amended by this act:
(1) 170 IAC 4.
(2) 170 IAC 5.
(3) 170 IAC 6.
(4) Any other rule that:
(A) has been adopted by the commission; and
(B) is inconsistent with IC 8-1-2-121, as amended by this
act.
(d) Not later than June 15, 2026, a utility shall do the following:
(1) Amend any tariff of the utility that:
(A) is in effect on March 14, 2026, for residential
customers of the utility; and
(B) is inconsistent with IC 8-1-2-121, as amended by this
act;
to bring the tariff into conformance with IC 8-1-2-121, as
amended by this act.
(2) File with the commission a petition for approval of each
tariff amended under subdivision (1).
(e) Not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of a utility's
petition under subsection (d)(2), the commission shall either:
(1) approve an amended tariff filed by the utility under
subsection (d)(2); or
(2) require the utility to make any changes to the amended
tariff necessary, as determined by the commission, to bring
the tariff into conformance with IC 8-1-2-121, as amended by
this act.
(f) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 153—LS 6627/DI 119